fr: Taille de l’insert de coussin: 12 x 12 po; 12 x 20 po; 12 x 24 po; 14 x 14 po; 14 x 20 po; 16 x 16 po; 16 x 20 po; 16 x 24 po; 18 x 18 po; 18 x 24 po; 20 x 20 po; 20 x 26 po; 22 x 22 po; 24 x 24 po; 26 x 26 po; 28 x 28 po; 30 x 30 po; Traversin : 6 x 18 po; Traversin : 6 x 20 po; Personnalisé/autre; Autre
es: Tamaño del relleno de almohadón: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Cilíndrico: 6 in x 18 in; Cilíndrico: 6 in x 20 in; Personalizado/otro; Otro
de: Größe des Kisseninletts: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Nackenrolle: 6 in x 18 in; Nackenrolle: 6 in x 20 in; Benutzerdefiniert/Andere; Andere
bg-BG: Размер на формата на възглавницата: 12 инча x 12 инча; 12 инча x 20 инча; 12 инча x 24 инча; 14 инча x 14 инча; 14 инча x 20 инча; 16 инча x 16 инча; 16 инча x 20 инча; 16 инча x 24 инча; 18 инча x 18 инча; 18 инча x 24 инча; 20 инча x 20 инча; 20 инча x 26 инча; 22 инча x 22 инча; 24 инча x 24 инча; 26 инча x 26 инча; 28 инча x 28 инча; 30 инча x 30 инча; Цилиндрична: 6 инча x 18 инча; Цилиндрична: 6 инча x 20 инча; По поръчка / Друго; Друго
da: Pudeforms størrelse: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Pølle: 6 in x 18 in; Pølle: 6 in x 20 in; Tilpasset/andet; Andet
lt-LT: Pagalvės užpildo dydis: 12 col. x 12 col.; 12 col. x 20 col.; 12 col. x 24 col.; 14 col. x 14 col.; 14 col. x 20 col.; 16 col. x 16 col.; 16 col. x 20 col.; 16 col. x 24 col.; 18 col. x 18 col.; 18 col. x 24 col.; 20 col. x 20 col.; 20 col. x 26 col.; 22 col. x 22 col.; 24 col. x 24 col.; 26 col. x 26 col.; 28 col. x 28 col.; 30 col. x 30 col.; Volelis: 6 col. x 18 col.; Volelis: 6 col. x 20 col.; Pasirinktinis / kita; Kita
pl: Rozmiar formy poduszki: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Wałek: 6 in x 18 in; Wałek: 6 in x 20 in; Niestandardowy / inny; Inny
ru: Размер подушечного вкладыша: 12 x 12 дюймов; 12 x 20 дюймов; 12 x 24 дюймов; 14 x 14 дюймов; 14 x 20 дюймов; 16 x 16 дюймов; 16 x 20 дюймов; 16 x 24 дюймов; 18 x 18 дюймов; 18 x 24 дюймов; 20 x 20 дюймов; 20 x 26 дюймов; 22 x 22 дюймов; 24 x 24 дюймов; 26 x 26 дюймов; 28 x 28 дюймов; 30 x 30 дюймов; Валик: 6 x 18 дюймов; Валик: 6 x 20 дюймов; Пользовательский / другое; Другое
it: Dimensioni della forma del cuscino: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Cilindrico: 6 in x 18 in; Cilindrico: 6 in x 20 in; Personalizzato/altro; Altro
fi: Sisätyynyn koko: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Putkityyny: 6 in x 18 in; Putkityyny: 6 in x 20 in; Mukautettu/muu; Muu
zh-TW: 枕芯尺寸: 12 吋 x 12 吋; 12 吋 x 20 吋; 12 吋 x 24 吋; 14 吋 x 14 吋; 14 吋 x 20 吋; 16 吋 x 16 吋; 16 吋 x 20 吋; 16 吋 x 24 吋; 18 吋 x 18 吋; 18 吋 x 24 吋; 20 吋 x 20 吋; 20 吋 x 26 吋; 22 吋 x 22 吋; 24 吋 x 24 吋; 26 吋 x 26 吋; 28 吋 x 28 吋; 30 吋 x 30 吋; 圓柱枕：6 吋 x 18 吋; 圓柱枕：6 吋 x 20 吋; 自訂/其他; 其他
sl-SI: Velikost polnilne blazine: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Valjast: 6 in x 18 in; Valjast: 6 in x 20 in; Po meri/drugo; Drugo
hr-HR: Veličina oblika jastuka: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Valjkasti jastuk: 6 in x 18 in; Valjkasti jastuk: 6 in x 20 in; Prilagođeno/ostalo; Ostalo
pt-PT: Formato de almofada: 12 x 12 pol.; 12 x 20 pol.; 12 x 24 pol.; 14 x 14 pol.; 14 x 20 pol.; 16 x 16 pol.; 16 x 20 pol.; 16 x 24 pol.; 18 x 18 pol.; 18 x 24 pol.; 20 x 20 pol.; 20 x 26 pol.; 22 x 22 pol.; 24 x 24 pol.; 26 x 26 pol.; 28 x 28 pol.; 30 x 30 pol.; Rolo: 6 x 18 pol.; Rolo: 6 x 20 pol.; Personalizado/outro; Outro
tr: Yastık içi ölçüsü: 12 x 12 inç; 12 x 20 inç; 12 x 24 inç; 14 x 14 inç; 14 x 20 inç; 16 x 16 inç; 16 x 20 inç; 16 x 24 inç; 18 x 18 inç; 18 x 24 inç; 20 x 20 inç; 20 x 26 inç; 22 x 22 inç; 24 x 24 inç; 26 x 26 inç; 28 x 28 inç; 30 x 30 inç; Silindir: 6 x 18 inç; Silindir: 6 x 20 inç; Özel/diğer; Diğer
vi: Kích thước ruột gối: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Gối ôm: 6 in x 18 in; Gối ôm: 6 in x 20 in; Tùy chỉnh/Khác; Khác
cs: Velikost sypky na polštáře: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Válec: 6 in x 18 in; Válec: 6 in x 20 in; Vlastní/ostatní; Ostatní
pt-BR: Travesseiro forma tamanho: 12 pol. x 12 pol.; 12 pol. x 20 pol.; 12 pol. x 24 pol.; 14 pol. x 14 pol.; 14 pol. x 20 pol.; 16 pol. x 16 pol.; 16 pol. x 20 pol.; 16 pol. x 24 pol.; 18 pol. x 18 pol.; 18 pol. x 24 pol.; 20 pol. x 20 pol.; 20 pol. x 26 pol.; 22 pol. x 22 pol.; 24 pol. x 24 pol.; 26 pol. x 26 pol.; 28 pol. x 28 pol.; 30 pol. x 30 pol.; Rolo: 6 pol. x 18 pol.; Rolo: 6 pol. x 20 pol.; Personalizado/Outros; Outros
hu: Párnabetét mérete: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Hengerpárna: 6 in x 18 in; Hengerpárna: 6 in x 20 in; Egyedi/egyéb; Egyéb
el: Μέγεθος μαξιλαριού: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Κυλινδρικό μαξιλάρι: 6 in x 18 in; Κυλινδρικό μαξιλάρι: 6 in x 20 in; Προσαρμοσμένο/Άλλο; Άλλο
nl: Kussen vorm maat: 12 x 12 inch; 12 x 20 inch; 12 x 24 inch; 14 x 14 inch; 14 x 20 inch; 16 x 16 inch; 16 x 20 inch; 16 x 24 inch; 18 x 18 inch; 18 x 24 inch; 20 x 20 inch; 20 x 26 inch; 22 x 22 inch; 24 x 24 inch; 26 x 26 inch; 28 x 28 inch; 30 x 30 inch; Rol: 6 x 18 inch; Rol: 6 x 20 inch; Op maat/overige; Overige
ro-RO: Dimensiunea/forma pernei: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Rulou: 6 in x 18 in; Rulou: 6 in x 20 in; Personalizat/altele; Altele
sk-SK: Veľkosť vankúšovej formy: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Valcový: 6 in x 18 in; Valcový: 6 in x 20 in; Vlastné/iné; Iné
th: ขนาดของหมอน: 12 x 12 นิ้ว; 12 x 20 นิ้ว; 12 x 24 นิ้ว; 14 x 14 นิ้ว; 14 x 20 นิ้ว; 16 x 16 นิ้ว; 16 x 20 นิ้ว; 16 x 24 นิ้ว; 18 x 18 นิ้ว; 18 x 24 นิ้ว; 20 x 20 นิ้ว; 20 x 26 นิ้ว; 22 x 22 นิ้ว; 24 x 24 นิ้ว; 26 x 26 นิ้ว; 28 x 28 นิ้ว; 30 x 30 นิ้ว; หมอนข้าง: 6 x 18 นิ้ว; หมอนข้าง: 6 x 20 นิ้ว; กำหนดเอง/อื่นๆ; อื่นๆ
ja: 枕形状サイズ: 12インチ x 12インチ; 12インチ x 20インチ; 12インチ x 24インチ; 14インチ x 14インチ; 14インチ x 20インチ; 16インチ x 16インチ; 16インチ x 20インチ; 16インチ x 24インチ; 18インチ x 18インチ; 18インチ x 24インチ; 20インチ x 20インチ; 20インチ x 26インチ; 22インチ x 22インチ; 24インチ x 24インチ; 26インチ x 26インチ; 28インチ x 28インチ; 30インチ x 30インチ; ボルスター: 6インチ x 18インチ; ボルスター: 6インチ x 20インチ; カスタム/その他; その他
en: Pillow form size: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Bolster: 6 in x 18 in; Bolster: 6 in x 20 in; Custom/Other; Other
ko: 베개 솜/속 사이즈: 12인치 x 12인치; 12인치 x 20인치; 12인치 x 24인치; 14인치 x 14인치; 14인치 x 20인치; 16인치 x 16인치; 16인치 x 20인치; 16인치 x 24인치; 18인치 x 18인치; 18인치 x 24인치; 20인치 x 20인치; 20인치 x 26인치; 22인치 x 22인치; 24인치 x 24인치; 26인치 x 26인치; 28인치 x 28인치; 30인치 x 30인치; 볼스터: 6인치 x 18인치; 볼스터: 6인치 x 20인치; 맞춤형/기타; 기타
nb: Puteformstørrelse: 12 in x 12 in; 12 in x 20 in; 12 in x 24 in; 14 in x 14 in; 14 in x 20 in; 16 in x 16 in; 16 in x 20 in; 16 in x 24 in; 18 in x 18 in; 18 in x 24 in; 20 in x 20 in; 20 in x 26 in; 22 in x 22 in; 24 in x 24 in; 26 in x 26 in; 28 in x 28 in; 30 in x 30 in; Pølle: 6 in x 18 in; Pølle: 6 in x 20 in; Egendefinert/annet; Annet
sv: Kuddeform – storlek: 12 x 12 tum; 12 x 20 tum; 12 x 24 tum; 14 x 14 tum; 14 x 20 tum; 16 x 16 tum; 16 x 20 tum; 16 x 24 tum; 18 x 18 tum; 18 x 24 tum; 20 x 20 tum; 20 x 26 tum; 22 x 22 tum; 24 x 24 tum; 26 x 26 tum; 28 x 28 tum; 30 x 30 tum; Cylinderkudde: 6 x 18 tum; Cylinderkudde: 6 x 20 tum; Anpassad/övrigt; Övrigt
zh-CN: 枕芯成品尺寸: 12 英寸 x 12 英寸; 12 英寸 x 20 英寸; 12 英寸 x 24 英寸; 14 英寸 x 14 英寸; 14 英寸 x 20 英寸; 16 英寸 x 16 英寸; 16 英寸 x 20 英寸; 16 英寸 x 24 英寸; 18 英寸 x 18 英寸; 18 英寸 x 24 英寸; 20 英寸 x 20 英寸; 20 英寸 x 26 英寸; 22 英寸 x 22 英寸; 24 英寸 x 24 英寸; 26 英寸 x 26 英寸; 28 英寸 x 28 英寸; 30 英寸 x 30 英寸; 圆柱枕：6 英寸 x 18 英寸; 圆柱枕：6 英寸 x 20 英寸; 自定义/其他; 其他